Wisconsin, session 2025, SB845.
do enact as follows:SB845,11Section 1. 23.33 (4p) (a) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,2,4223.33 (4p) (a) 2. b. That a refusal to provide a sample or to submit to a 3chemical test constitutes a violation under par. (e) and is subject to the same 4penalties and procedures as a violation of sub. (4c) (a) 1.SB845,21Section 2. 23.33 (4p) (a) 3. of the statutes is repealed.SB845,32Section 3. 23.33 (4p) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,3,11323.33 (4p) (c) 1. ‘Additional chemical test.’ If a person is arrested for a 4violation of the intoxicated operation of an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain 5vehicle law or is the operator of an all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle 6involved in an accident resulting in great bodily harm to or the death of someone 7and if the person is requested to provide a sample or to submit to a test under par. 8(a) 1., the person may request the test facility to administer the additional chemical 9test specified under par. (b) 3. or, at his or her own expense, reasonable opportunity 10to have any qualified person administer a chemical test of his or her breath, blood or 11urine for the purpose of authorized analysis.SB845,412Section 4. 23.33 (4p) (e) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,3,161323.33 (4p) (e) 3. Whether the law enforcement officer requested the person to 14provide a sample or to submit to a chemical test and provided the information 15required under par. (a) 2. or whether the request and information was unnecessary 16under par. (a) 3.SB845,517Section 5. 23.33 (13) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,3,231823.33 (13) (b) 2. Except as provided under subd. 3., a person who violates sub. 19(4c) (a) 1., 2., or 2m. or (4p) (e) and who, within 5 years prior to the arrest for the 20current violation, was convicted previously under the intoxicated operation of an 21all-terrain vehicle or utility terrain vehicle law or the refusal law shall be fined not 22less than $300 nor more than $1,100 and shall be imprisoned not less than 5 days 23nor more than 6 months.SB845,624Section 6. 23.33 (13) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,4,6123.33 (13) (b) 3. A person who violates sub. (4c) (a) 1., 2., or 2m. or (4p) (e) and 2who, within 5 years prior to the arrest for the current violation, was convicted 2 or 3more times previously under the intoxicated operation of an all-terrain vehicle or 4utility terrain vehicle law or refusal law shall be fined not less than $600 nor more 5than $2,000 and shall be imprisoned not less than 30 days nor more than one year 6in the county jail.SB845,77Section 7. 30.684 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,4,10830.684 (1) (b) 2. That a refusal to provide a sample or to submit to a chemical 9test constitutes a violation under sub. (5) and is subject to the same penalties and 10procedures as a violation of s. 30.681 (1) (a); andSB845,811Section 8. 30.684 (1) (c) of the statutes is repealed.SB845,912Section 9. 30.684 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,4,201330.684 (3) (a) Additional chemical test. If a person is arrested for a violation 14of the intoxicated boating law or is the operator of a motorboat involved in an 15accident resulting in great bodily harm to or the death of someone and if the person 16is requested to provide a sample or to submit to a test under sub. (1) (a), the person 17may request the test facility to administer the additional chemical test specified 18under sub. (2) (c) or, at his or her own expense, reasonable opportunity to have any 19qualified person administer a chemical test of his or her breath, blood or urine for 20the purpose of authorized analysis.SB845,1021Section 10. 30.684 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,5,22230.684 (5) (c) Whether the law enforcement officer requested the person to 23provide a sample or to submit to a chemical test and provided the information 1required under sub. (1) (b) or whether the request and information was unnecessary 2under sub. (1) (c).SB845,113Section 11. 30.80 (6) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,5,9430.80 (6) (a) 2. A person who violates s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b), a local ordinance 5in conformity with s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b) or the refusal law and who, within 5 years 6prior to the arrest for the current violation, was convicted one time previously 7under the intoxicated boating law or the refusal law shall be fined not less than 8$300 nor more than $1,000 and shall be imprisoned for not less than 5 days nor 9more than 6 months.SB845,1210Section 12. 30.80 (6) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,5,161130.80 (6) (a) 3. A person who violates s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b), a local ordinance 12in conformity with s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b) or the refusal law and who, within 5 years 13prior to the arrest for the current violation, was convicted 2 times previously under 14the intoxicated boating law or refusal law shall be fined not less than $600 nor more 15than $2,000 and shall be imprisoned for not less than 30 days nor more than one 16year in the county jail.SB845,1317Section 13. 30.80 (6) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,5,231830.80 (6) (a) 4. A person who violates s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b), a local ordinance 19in conformity with s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b) or the refusal law and who, within 5 years 20prior to the arrest for the current violation, was convicted 3 times previously under 21the intoxicated boating law or refusal law shall be fined not less than $600 nor more 22than $2,000 and shall be imprisoned for not less than 60 days nor more than one 23year in the county jail.SB845,1424Section 14. 30.80 (6) (a) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,6,6130.80 (6) (a) 5. A person who violates s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b), a local ordinance 2in conformity with s. 30.681 (1) (a) or (b) or the refusal law and who, within 5 years 3prior to the arrest for the current violation, was convicted 4 or more times 4previously under the intoxicated boating law or refusal law shall be fined not less 5than $600 nor more than $2,000 and shall be imprisoned for not less than 6 months 6nor more than one year in the county jail.SB845,157Section 15. 343.305 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,6,208343.305 (2) Implied consent. Any person who is on duty time with respect to 9a commercial motor vehicle or drives or operates a motor vehicle upon the public 10highways of this state, or in those areas enumerated in s. 346.61, is deemed to have 11given consent to one or more tests of his or her breath, blood or urine, for the 12purpose of determining the presence or quantity in his or her blood or breath, of 13alcohol, controlled substances, controlled substance analogs or other drugs, or any 14combination of alcohol, controlled substances, controlled substance analogs and 15other drugs, when requested to do so by a law enforcement officer under sub. (3) (a) 16or (am) or when required to do so under sub. (3) (ar) or (b). Any such tests shall be 17administered upon the request of a law enforcement officer. The law enforcement 18agency by which the officer is employed shall be prepared to administer, either at its 19agency or any other agency or facility, 2 of the 3 tests under sub. (3) (a), or (am), or 20(ar), and may designate which of the tests shall be administered first.SB845,1621Section 16. 343.305 (3) (title) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to 22read:SB845,6,2323343.305 (3) (title) Request for tests.SB845,1724Section 17. 343.305 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,7,71343.305 (3) (a) Upon arrest of a person for violation of s. 346.63 (1), (2m) or (5) 2or a local ordinance in conformity therewith, or for a violation of s. 346.63 (2) or (6) 3or 940.25, or s. 940.09 where the offense involved the use of a vehicle, or upon arrest 4subsequent to a refusal under par. (ar), a law enforcement officer may request the 5person to provide one or more samples of his or her breath, blood or urine for the 6purpose specified under sub. (2). Compliance with a request for one type of sample 7does not bar a subsequent request for a different type of sample.SB845,188Section 18. 343.305 (3) (ar) of the statutes is repealed.SB845,199Section 19. 343.305 (3) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB845,2010Section 20. 343.305 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB845,7,1311343.305 (4) Information. At the time that a chemical test specimen is 12requested under sub. (3) (a), or (am), or (ar), the law enforcement officer shall read 13the following to the person from whom the test specimen is requested:SB845,7,1914“You have either been arrested for an offense that involves driving or operating 15a motor vehicle while under the influence of after using alcohol or drugs, or both, or 16you are the operator of a vehicle that was involved in an accident that caused the 17death of, great bodily harm to, or substantial bodily harm to a person, or you are 18suspected of driving or being on duty time with respect to a commercial motor 19vehicle after consuming an intoxicating beverage using alcohol or drugs, or both.SB845,8,320This law enforcement agency now wants to test one or more samples of your 21breath, blood or urine to determine the concentration of alcohol or drugs in your 22system. If any test shows more alcohol in your system than the law permits while 23driving or a detectable amount of a restricted controlled substance, your operating 24privilege will be suspended. If you refuse to take any test that this agency requests 1any requested test, your operating privilege will be revoked and you will be subject 2to other penalties. The test results or the fact that you refused testing can be used 3against you in court.SB845,8,84If you take all the requested tests, you may also choose to take further tests. 5You may take the alternative test that this law enforcement agency provides free of 6charge. You also may also have a test conducted by a qualified person of your choice 7at your expense. You, however, will have to make your own arrangements for that 8test.SB845,8,119If you have a commercial driver license or were operating a commercial motor 10vehicle, other consequences may result from positive test results or from refusing 11testing, such as being placed out of service or disqualified.”SB845,2112Section 21. 343.305 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb845 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb845 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB845 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB845 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB845: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting